Tennessee statutes. Title 19 Civil Procedure In General Sessions Courts
Part 2

Stay of Execution [Repealed]

19-3-201 — 19-3-210. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 19-3-201 — 19-3-210 (Acts 1858, §§ 3059-3065; Shan., § 4786-4796; Code 1932, §§ 8917-8927; T.C.A., §§ 19-701 — 19-710), concerning stays of executions of judgments, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 241, §§ 54.